Tennessee, session 114, SB0442.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 43-38-109(a), is amended by
deleting the language "a copy of the original statement of resignation" and substituting instead
the language "written notice of the registered agent's resignation".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-15-103(a), is amended by
deleting the language "a copy thereof" and substituting instead the language "written notice of
the registered agent's resignation" in the first sentence of the subsection.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-25-109(a), is amended by
deleting the language "a copy thereof" and substituting instead the language "written notice of
the registered agent's resignation" in the first sentence of the subsection.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-55-103(a), is amended by
deleting the language "a copy thereof" and substituting instead the language "written notice of
the registered agent's resignation" in the first sentence of the subsection.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-65-109(a), is amended by
deleting the language "a copy thereof" and substituting instead the language "written notice of
the registered agent's resignation" in the first sentence of the subsection.
SB0442
000677
- 1 -

SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-208-103(a), is amended by
deleting the language "a copy thereof" and substituting instead the language "written notice of
the registered agent's resignation" in the first sentence of the subsection.
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-249-111(a), is amended by
deleting the language "a copy of the statement of resignation" and substituting instead the
language "written notice of the registered agent's resignation" in the first sentence of the
subsection.
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 61-1-1002(e), is amended by
deleting the language "a copy thereof" and substituting instead the language "written notice of
the registered agent's resignation" in the first sentence of the subsection.
SECTION 9. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 61-2-104(d), is amended by deleting
the language "a copy thereof" and substituting instead the language "written notice of the
registered agent's resignation" in the first sentence of the subsection.
SECTION 10. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 61-2-904(h), is amended by
deleting the language "a copy thereof" and substituting instead the language "written notice of
the registered agent's resignation" in the first sentence of the subsection.
SECTION 11. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 61-3-117(a)(4), is amended by
deleting the language "a copy of the statement" and substituting instead the language "written
notice of the registered agent's resignation".
SECTION 12. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000677